Nebraska, session 109, LB127.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB127 LB127
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Legislature finds that people who are mistakenly
or wrongfully prosecuted suffer significant financial hardship as a
result. The purpose of this section is to lessen the hardship faced by
such people and to serve as an incentive for the government to use
caution and restraint in making prosecutorial decisions.
(2) For purposes of this section, prosecutor includes the Attorney
General, a deputy attorney general, assistant attorneys general, a county
attorney, a deputy county attorney, a city attorney, or any other person
with the authority to prosecute criminal actions.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person
against whom any criminal charge has been filed or prosecuted shall be
awarded damages as provided in this section if:
(a) The person is granted an absolute discharge as provided in
section 29-1208;
(b) The prosecutor voluntarily dismisses the charges, except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section;
(c) The charges are dismissed by the trial court or on appeal;
(d) In a jury trial, the jury returns a verdict of not guilty;
(e) In a bench trial, the court finds the person to be not guilty;
or
(f) The conviction is overturned on appeal or pursuant to any form
of postconviction relief.
(4)(a) A defendant is not entitled to relief under this section for
any offense described in subsection (3) of this section if:
(i) The defendant is convicted of another offense arising out of
substantially the same misconduct;
(ii) The other offense is classified as the same level of
misdemeanor or felony or as a higher level;
(iii) The conviction for such other offense is not dismissed,
overturned, or vacated.
(b) Misconduct is substantially the same if the misconduct arises
-2-

LB127 LB127
2025 2025
out of the same transaction or event, is part of a common scheme or plan,
or is substantively similar and close in time. Factors to consider in
determining whether misconduct is substantially similar include the
passage of time between each occurrence; the parties involved in each
occurrence, including the victims; and the charges brought.
(5) A defendant may enter into an agreement with a prosecutor to
dismiss charges and may waive the payment of damages under this section
in such agreement.
(6) Upon the occurrence of an event described in subsection (3) of
this section, the trial court shall hold a hearing to determine the
amount of damages to be awarded. The court shall award:
(a) Reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation expenses,
including for trial and any appeals or actions for postconviction relief;
and
(b) Actual damages caused by the filing of charges, arrest,
detention, prosecution, conviction, or imprisonment, including, but not
limited to, lost wages.
Sec. 2. Section 29-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-1208 If a defendant is not brought to trial before the running of
the time for trial as provided for in section 29-1207, as extended by
excluded periods, he or she shall be entitled to:
(1) His his or her absolute discharge from the offense charged and
for any other offense required by law to be joined with that offense;
and .
(2) Damages as provided in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. Original section 29-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-